Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3502
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) Surgical assisting is an established health profession in Nebraska;

(2) Surgical first assistants aid in ensuring a safe surgical environment by maximizing patient safety by using appropriate techniques for processes, including, but not limited to, maintaining hemostasis, proper patient positioning, clear visualization of the operative site, proper closure of the operative site, and correct dressing of a wound; and

(3) It is necessary to encourage the most effective utilization of the skills of surgical first assistants by enabling them to perform tasks delegated by a licensed physician.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 2.